New Jersey, session 222, A1206.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  Section 4 of P.L.1985, c.222 (C.52:27D-304) is amended to read as follows: 4.  As used in P.L.1985, c.222 (C.52:27D-301 et al.): a.    "Council" means the Council on Affordable Housing established in P.L.1985, c.222 (C.52:27D-301 et al.), abolished pursuant to section 3 of P.L.2024, c.2 (C.52:27D-304.1). b.    "Housing region" means a geographic area established pursuant to subsection b. of section 6 of P.L.2024, c.2 (C.52:27D-304.2). c.    "Low-income housing" means housing affordable according to federal Department of Housing and Urban Development or other recognized standards for home ownership and rental costs and occupied or reserved for occupancy by households with a gross household income equal to 50 percent or less of the median gross household income for households of the same size within the housing region in which the housing is located. d.    "Moderate-income housing" means housing affordable according to federal Department of Housing and Urban Development or other recognized standards for home ownership and rental costs and occupied or reserved for occupancy by households with a gross household income equal to more than 50 percent but less than 80 percent of the median gross household income for households of the same size within the housing region in which the housing is located. e.    (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2024, c.2) f.     "Inclusionary development" means a residential housing development in which a substantial percentage of the housing units are provided for a reasonable income range of low- and moderate-income households. g.    "Conversion" means the conversion of existing commercial, industrial, or residential structures for low- and moderate-income housing purposes where a substantial percentage of the housing units are provided for a reasonable income range of low- and moderate-income households. h.    "Development" means any development for which permission may be required pursuant to the "Municipal Land Use Law," P.L.1975, c.291 (C.40:55D-1 et seq.). i.     "Agency" means the New Jersey Housing and Mortgage Finance Agency established by P.L.1983, c.530 (C.55:14K-1 et seq.). j.     "Prospective need" means a projection of housing needs based on development and growth which is reasonably likely to occur in a region or a municipality, as the case may be, as a result of actual determination of public and private entities.  Prospective need shall be determined by the methodology set forth pursuant to sections 6 and 7 of P.L.2024, c.2 (C.52:27D-304.2 and C.52:27D-304.3) for the fourth round and all future rounds of housing obligations. k.    "Person with a disability" means a person with a physical disability, infirmity, malformation, or disfigurement which is caused by bodily injury, birth defect, aging, or illness including epilepsy and other seizure disorders, and which shall include, but not be limited to, any degree of paralysis, amputation, lack of physical coordination, blindness or visual impairment, deafness or hearing impairment, the inability to speak or a speech impairment, or physical reliance on a service animal, wheelchair, or other remedial appliance or device. l.     "Adaptable" means constructed in compliance with the technical design standards of the barrier free subcode adopted by the Commissioner of Community Affairs pursuant to the "State Uniform Construction Code Act," P.L.1975, c.217 (C.52:27D-119 et seq.) and in accordance with the provisions of section 5 of P.L.2005, c.350 (C.52:27D-123.15). m.   "Very low-income housing" means housing affordable according to federal Department of Housing and Urban Development or other recognized standards for home ownership and rental costs and occupied or reserved for occupancy by households with a gross household income equal to 30 percent or less of the median gross household income for households of the same size within the housing region in which the housing is located. n.    "Accessory dwelling unit" means a residential dwelling unit that provides complete independent living facilities with a private entrance for one or more persons, consisting of provisions for living, sleeping, eating, sanitation, and cooking, including a stove and refrigerator, and is located within a proposed or existing primary dwelling, within an existing or proposed structure that is accessory to a dwelling on the same lot, constructed in whole or part as an extension to a proposed or existing primary dwelling, or constructed as a separate detached structure on the same lot as the existing or proposed primary dwelling. o.    "Builder's remedy" means court-imposed, site-specific relief for a litigant who seeks to build affordable housing for which the court requires a municipality to utilize zoning techniques, such as mandatory set-asides or density bonuses, including techniques which provide for the economic viability of a residential development by including housing that is not for low- and moderate-income households. p.    "Commissioner" means the Commissioner of Community Affairs. q.    "Compliance certification" means the certification obtained by a municipality pursuant to section 3 of P.L.2024, c.2 (C.52:27D-304.1), that protects the municipality from exclusionary zoning litigation during the current round of present and prospective need and through July 1 of the year the next round begins, which is also known as a "judgment of compliance" or "judgment of repose."  The term "compliance certification" shall include a judgment of repose granted in an action filed pursuant to section 13 of P.L.1985, c.222 (C.52:27D-313). r.     "County-level housing judge" means a judge appointed pursuant to section 5 of P.L.2024, c.2 (C.52:27D-313.2), to resolve disputes over the compliance of municipal fair share affordable housing obligations and municipal fair share plans and housing elements, with the "Fair Housing Act," P.L.1985, c.222 (C.52:27D-301 et al.). s.     "Deficient housing unit" means housing that: (1) is over fifty years old and overcrowded; (2) lacks complete plumbing; or (3) lacks complete kitchen facilities. t.     "Department" means the Department of Community Affairs. u.    "Exclusionary zoning litigation" means litigation to challenge the fair share plan, housing element, or ordinances or resolutions implementing the fair share plan or housing element of a municipality based on alleged noncompliance with the "Fair Housing Act," P.L.1985, c.222 (C.52:27D-301 et al.) or the Mount Laurel doctrine, which litigation shall include, but shall not be limited to, litigation seeking a builder's remedy. v.    "Fair share plan" means the plan or proposal that is in a form which may readily be adopted, with accompanying ordinances and resolutions, pursuant to subsection f. of section 3 of P.L.2024, c.2 (C.52:27D-304.1), by which a municipality proposes to satisfy its obligation to create a realistic opportunity to meet its fair share of low- and moderate-income housing needs of its region and which details the affirmative measures the municipality proposes to undertake to achieve its fair share of low- and moderate-income housing, as provided in the municipal housing element, and addresses the development regulations necessary to implement the housing element, including, but not limited to, inclusionary requirements and development fees, and the elimination of unnecessary housing cost-generating features from the municipal land use ordinances and regulations. w.   "Highlands-conforming municipality" means a municipality that has adopted a land development ordinance implementing the municipality's plan conformance petition and which land development ordinance has been certified by the Highlands Water Protection and Planning Council as consistent with the "Highlands Water Protection and Planning Act," P.L.2004, c.120 (C.13:20-1 et seq.), the Highlands regional master plan, and the municipality's plan conformance approval.  The term "land development ordinance" shall be inclusive of any amendment to the municipality's land development ordinances that is adopted to further the municipality's petition of plan conformance. x.    "Housing element" means that portion of a municipality's master plan consisting of reports, statements, proposals, maps, diagrams, and text designed to meet the municipality's fair share of its region's present and prospective housing needs, particularly with regard to low- and moderate-income housing, and which shall contain the municipal present and prospective obligation for affordable housing, determined pursuant to subsection f. of section 3 of P.L.2024, c.2 (C.52:27D-304.1). y.    "Program" means the Affordable Housing Dispute Resolution Program, established pursuant to section 5 of P.L.2024, c.2 (C.52:27D-313.2). z.    "State Development and Redevelopment Plan" or "State Plan" means the plan prepared pursuant to sections 1 through 12 of the "State Planning Act," P.L.1985, c.398 (C.52:18A-196 et al.), designed to represent a balance of development and conservation objectives best suited to meet the needs of the State, and for the purpose of coordinating planning activities and establishing Statewide planning objectives in the areas of land use, housing, economic development, transportation, natural resource conservation, agriculture and farmland retention, recreation, urban and suburban redevelopment, historic preservation, public facilities and services, and intergovernmental coordination pursuant to subsection f. of section 5 of P.L.1985, c.398 (C.52:18A-200). aa.   "Transitional housing" means temporary housing that: includes, but is not limited to, single-room occupancy housing or shared living and supportive living arrangements; provides access to on-site or off-site supportive services for very low-income households who have recently been homeless or lack table housing; is licensed by the department; and allows households to remain for a minimum of six months. bb.  "Middle housing" means a building which consists of not less than two housing units, and not more than four housing units.  "Middle housing" shall include, but shall not be limited to, a group of not less than two, and not more than four, connected townhouses. cc.   "Middle housing conversion" means the renovation, construction, or reconstruction of a building, which consists of not more than four housing units before the conversion, to increase the number of low- or moderate-income housing units in the building or in the land appurtenant thereto.  A "middle housing conversion" shall include, but shall not be limited to, the construction of an accessory dwelling unit. (cf: P.L.2024, c.2, s.2) 2.  Section 36 of P.L.2024, c.2 (C.52:27D-313.3) is amended to read as follows: 36.  a.  (1)  Notwithstanding the provisions of the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.) to the contrary, the Commissioner of Community Affairs shall, in consultation with the Administrative Director of the Courts and the Executive Director of the New Jersey Housing and Mortgage Finance Agency, adopt, immediately upon filing with the Office of Administrative Law, no later than nine months after the effective date of P.L.2024, c.2 (C.52:27D-304.1 et al.), such transitional rules and regulations as necessary for the implementation of P.L.2024, c.2 (C.52:27D-304.1 et al.), including for: (a) the identification of any vestigial duties of the Council on Affordable Housing and the transfer of those duties within the Department of Community Affairs to the extent that those duties are not otherwise assumed, pursuant to P.L.2024, c.2 (C.52:27D-304.1 et al.), by municipalities or the Affordable Housing Dispute Resolution Program; and (b) the establishment of policies regarding the cost of the assessments and fees of planned real estate developments, as defined in section 3 of P.L.1977, c.419 (C.45:22A-23), on low- and moderate-income housing units. (2)  The department, in consultation with the agency, shall thereafter amend, adopt, or readopt the regulations in accordance with the requirements of the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.). b.  The Executive Director of the New Jersey Housing and Mortgage Finance Agency, in consultation with the department, shall adopt, pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), no later than nine months after the effective date of P.L.2024, c.2 (C.52:27D-304.1 et al.), rules and regulations to update the Uniform Housing Affordability Controls as required pursuant to the "Fair Housing Act," P.L.1985, c.222 (C.52:27D-301 et al.).  As part of updating the Uniform Housing Affordability Controls, the agency shall set rules establishing that, for the purpose of newly created low- and moderate-income rental units, a 40-year minimum deed restriction shall be required.  For the purpose of for-sale units, a 30-year minimum deed restriction shall be required.  For the purpose of housing units for which affordability controls are extended for a new term of affordability, a 30-year minimum deed restriction shall be required, provided that the minimum extension term may be limited to no less than 20 years as long as the original and extended terms, in combination, total at least 60 years.  Any 100 percent affordable rental property shall have a right to extinguish a deed restriction regardless of original length, beginning 30 years following the start of the deed restriction, provided a refinancing or rehabilitation, or both, for the purpose of preservation is commenced and that a new deed restriction of at least 30 years is provided.  A municipality shall be eligible to receive credits for all preserved units pursuant to this subsection, as long as the original and extended terms total at least 60 years, and this credit may be obtained at the time of preservation.  All 100 percent affordable projects shall be eligible for any affordable housing preservation program administered by the State, beginning 30 years following the start of the deed restriction, regardless of original length of the deed restriction.  Any State administered preservation program may allow a refinancing funding process to commence prior to the 30th year of the deed restriction when such refinancing or rehabilitation funding is needed to preserve affordable housing. c.  Notwithstanding any provision of subsection b. of this section, or paragraph (1) of subsection f. of section 21 of P.L.1985, c.222 (C.52:27D-321) to the contrary, a unit of low- or moderate-income housing shall have a term of affordability of not less than 10 years if the unit is created, and initially marketed for sale or rent as such, after the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) as a newly constructed middle housing project, or as a part of a middle housing conversion. (cf: P.L.2024, c.2, s.36) 3.  Section 21 of P.L.1985, c.222 (C.52:27D-321) is amended to read as follows: 21.  The agency shall establish affordable housing programs to assist municipalities in meeting the obligation of developing communities to provide low- and moderate-income housing. a.    Of the bond authority allocated to it under section 24 of P.L.1983, c.530 (C.55:14K-24) the agency will allocate, for a reasonable period of time established by its board, no less than 25 percent to be used in conjunction with housing to be constructed or rehabilitated with assistance under P.L.1985, c.222 (C.52:27D-301 et al.). b.  The agency shall to the extent of available funds, award assistance to affordable housing programs located in municipalities whose housing elements have obtained compliance certification, or which have been subject to a builder's remedy.  During any period which the agency may approve, the agency may assist affordable housing programs that have a pending request for compliance certification; provided the affordable housing program will meet all or in part a municipal low- and moderate-income housing obligation. c.    Assistance provided pursuant to this section may take the form of grants or awards to municipalities, prospective home purchasers, housing sponsors as defined in P.L.1983, c.530 (C.55:14K-1 et seq.), or as contributions to the issuance of mortgage revenue bonds or multi-family housing development bonds which have the effect of achieving the goal of producing affordable housing. d.    Affordable housing programs which may be financed or assisted under this provision may include, but are not limited to: (1)  Assistance for home purchase and improvement including interest rate assistance, down payment and closing cost assistance, and direct grants for principal reduction; (2)  Rental programs including loans or grants for developments containing low- and moderate-income housing, moderate rehabilitation of existing rental housing, congregate care and retirement facilities; (3)  Financial assistance for the conversion of nonresidential space to residences; (4)  Other housing programs for low- and moderate-income housing, including infrastructure projects directly facilitating the construction of low- and moderate-income housing; and (5)  Grants or loans to municipalities, housing sponsors and community organizations to encourage development of innovative approaches to affordable housing, including: (a)   Such advisory, consultative, training and educational services as will assist in the planning, construction, rehabilitation and operation of housing; and (b)  Encouraging research in and demonstration projects to develop new and better techniques and methods for increasing the supply, types and financing of housing and housing projects in the State. e.    The agency shall establish procedures and guidelines governing the qualifications of applicants, the application procedures and the criteria for awarding grants and loans for affordable housing programs and the standards for establishing the amount, terms and conditions of each grant or loan. f.  (1)  The agency, in consultation with the department, shall establish requirements and controls to ensure the maintenance of housing assisted under P.L.1985, c.222 (C.52:27D-301 et al.) as affordable to low- and moderate-income households for a period of not less than 40 years for newly created rental units, 30 years for for-sale units, and 30 years for housing units for which affordability controls are extended for a new term of affordability, provided that the minimum extension term may be limited to no less than 20 years as long as the original and extended terms, in combination, total at least 60 years.  Any 100 percent affordable rental property shall have a right to extinguish a deed restriction regardless of original length, beginning 30 years following the start of the deed restriction, provided a refinancing or rehabilitation, or both, for the purpose of preservation is commenced and that a new deed restriction of at least 30 years is provided.  A municipality shall be eligible to receive credits for all preserved units pursuant to this subsection, as long as the original and extended terms total at least 60 years, and this credit may be obtained at the time of preservation.  All 100 percent affordable projects shall be eligible for any affordable housing preservation program administered by the State, beginning 30 years following the start of the deed restriction, regardless of original length of the deed restriction.  Any State administered preservation program may allow a refinancing funding process to commence prior to the 30th year of the deed restriction when such refinancing or rehabilitation funding is needed to preserve affordable housing.  The agency may update or amend any controls previously adopted by the agency, in consultation with the Council on Affordable Housing, prior to the effective date of P.L.2024, c.2 (C.52:27D-304.1 et al.), provided that the requirements and controls shall, at a minimum, be consistent with the controls as in effect immediately prior to the effective date of P.L.2024, c.2 (C.52:27D-304.1 et al.), including, but not limited to, any requirements concerning bedroom distributions, affordability averages, and affirmative marketing.  The controls may include, among others, requirements for recapture of assistance provided pursuant to P.L.1985, c.222 (C.52:27D-301 et al.) or restrictions on return on equity in the event of failure to meet the requirements of the program.  With respect to rental housing financed by the agency pursuant to P.L.1985, c.222 (C.52:27D-301 et al.) or otherwise which promotes the provision or maintenance of low- and moderate-income housing, the agency may waive restrictions on return on equity required pursuant to P.L.1983, c.530 (C.55:14K-1 et seq.) which is gained through the sale of the property or of any interest in the property or sale of any interest in the housing sponsor.  The agency shall promulgate updated regulations no later than nine months following the effective date of P.L.2024, c.2 (C.52:27D-304.1 et al.).  All parties may continue to rely on regulations previously adopted by the agency pursuant to the authority provided by this section as in effect immediately prior to the effective date of P.L.2024, c.2 (C.52:27D-304.1 et al.) until new rules and regulations are adopted by the agency. Notwithstanding the provisions of the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.) to the contrary, the agency, after consultation with department, may adopt, immediately, upon filing with the Office of Administrative Law, said regulations, which shall be effective for a period not to exceed one year from the date of the filing.  The agency shall thereafter amend, adopt, or readopt the regulations in accordance with the requirements of P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.). (2)  Notwithstanding any provision of paragraph (1) of this subsection, or subsection b. of section 36 of P.L.2024, c.2 (C.52:27D-313.3) to the contrary, a unit of low- or moderate-income housing shall have a term of affordability of not less than 10 years if the unit is created, and initially marketed for sale or rent as such, after the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) as a newly constructed middle housing project, or as a part of a middle housing conversion. g.    The agency may establish affordable housing programs through the use or establishment of subsidiary corporations or development corporations as provided in P.L.1983, c.530 (C.55:14K-1 et seq.).  The subsidiary corporations or development corporations shall be eligible to receive funds provided under P.L.1985, c.222 (C.52:27D-301 et al.) for any permitted purpose. h.    The agency shall provide assistance, through its bonding powers or in any other manner within its powers, to the grant and loan program established pursuant to section 20 of P.L.1985, c.222 (C.52:27D-320). i.  (1)  The department shall promulgate processes and standards for the certification of administrative agents and municipal housing liaisons in the State, as well as standards for measuring performance of and enforcing compliance by administrative agents and municipal housing liaisons in implementing the affordable housing requirements and controls established pursuant to subsection f. of this section. (2)  Administrative agents shall be responsible for implementing the requirements and controls set by the regulations promulgated pursuant to subsection f. of this section.  The department may bring via summary proceeding any findings of violation of the responsibilities set forth in this section before a county-level housing judge to docket the violation and issue corrective orders and levy fines. (3)  Municipal housing liaisons shall be responsible for monitoring administrative agents within their municipality's jurisdiction to ensure compliance with the requirements and controls set by regulation under subsection f. of this section. (4)  Municipal housing liaisons, the department, and interested parties may bring a challenge before a county-level housing judge to determine whether properties subject to the regulations set forth by this section are out of compliance with the regulations. A finding of deliberate noncompliance may result in the department removing the administrative agent's certification. (5)  A county-level housing judge may issue fines and order corrective actions for violations and may consider patterns of violations in determining whether a municipality is meeting its obligations under the compliance certification established by section 3 of P.L.2024, c.2 (C.52:27D-304.1). (6)  Notwithstanding the provisions of the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), to the contrary, the department may adopt, immediately, upon filing with the Office of Administrative Law, regulations to implement the provisions of this subsection, which shall be effective for a period not to exceed one year from the date of the filing.  The department shall thereafter amend, adopt, or readopt the regulations in accordance with the requirements of P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.). (cf: P.L.2024, c.2, s.27) 4.  This act shall take effect immediately.